Washington statutes.
RCW 10.73.120

Collateral attack—One year time limit—Duty of department of corrections to advise.

As soon as practicable after July 23, 1989, the department of corrections shall attempt to advise the following persons of the time limit specified in RCW 10.73.090 and 10.73.100: Every person who, on July 23, 1989, is serving a term of incarceration, probation, parole, or community supervision pursuant to conviction of a felony.

[ 1989 c 395 s 5.]